Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-945
Use of terms certification, certified, registration, and registered; how construed.

For purposes of the Occupational Board Reform Act:

(1) Government certification and registration are not synonymous with occupational license;

(2) Except as provided in section 84-935, when the terms certification and certified are used outside of the Occupational Board Reform Act to mean a requirement that an individual meet certain personal qualifications to work legally, those terms in that context shall be interpreted for purposes of the Occupational Board Reform Act as requiring an individual to meet the requirements for an occupational license; and

(3) Except as provided in section 84-944, when the terms registration and registered are used outside of the Occupational Board Reform Act to mean a requirement that an individual meet certain personal qualifications to work legally, those terms in that context shall be interpreted for purposes of the Occupational Board Reform Act as requiring an individual to meet the requirements for an occupational license.

Laws 2018, LB299, § 13.